Wisconsin, session 2025, AB392.
do enact as follows:AB392,13Section 1. Nonstatutory provisions.AB392,2,21(1) Task force on missing and murdered African American women and 2girls.AB392,2,53(a) Definition. In this subsection, “nongovernmental organization” means a 4nonprofit, nongovernmental organization that provides legal, social, or other 5community services.AB392,2,116(b) Membership. Within 45 days after the effective date of this paragraph, the 7attorney general shall establish a special committee under s. 15.04 (1) (c) called the 8task force on missing and murdered African American women and girls. The task 9force shall consist of the following members who are knowledgeable in crime victims 10rights or violence protection and who shall be appointed by and serve at the 11pleasure of the attorney general unless otherwise specified:AB392,2,13121. Two members of the senate, one appointed by the majority leader of the 13senate and one appointed by the minority leader of the senate.AB392,2,15142. Two members of the assembly, one appointed by the speaker of the 15assembly and one appointed by the minority leader of the assembly.AB392,2,16163. Two representatives from among the following:AB392,2,1717a. The Wisconsin Chiefs of Police Association.AB392,2,1818b. The Badger State Sheriffs’ Association.AB392,2,1919c. The division of criminal investigation within the department of justice.AB392,2,20204. One or more representatives from among the following:AB392,2,2121a. The Wisconsin District Attorneys Association.AB392,2,2222b. A U.S. Attorney’s office in this state.AB392,2,2323c. A judge or attorney working in juvenile court.AB392,3,215. A county coroner or representative from a statewide coroner’s association or 2a representative of the department of health services.AB392,3,336. Three or more representatives from among the following:AB392,3,54a. A statewide or local organization that provides legal services to African 5American women and girls.AB392,3,76b. A statewide or local organization that provides advocacy or counseling for 7African American women and girls who have been victims of violence.AB392,3,98c. A statewide or local organization that provides nonlegal services to African 9American women and girls.AB392,3,1010d. The Wisconsin Coalition Against Sexual Assault.AB392,3,1111e. End Domestic Abuse Wisconsin.AB392,3,1212f. An African American woman who is a survivor of gender violence.AB392,3,1313(c) Operation.AB392,3,19141. The task force under this subsection shall elect a chair and vice-chair from 15among the members of the task force and may elect other officers as necessary. The 16task force shall convene within 30 days after it is established and shall meet at least 17quarterly thereafter, or upon the call of its chair, and may hold meetings throughout 18the state. The task force shall meet sufficiently to accomplish the duties identified 19in par. (d).AB392,3,23202. The department of justice shall provide administrative support services to 21the task force under this subsection. The task force may call upon any state agency 22or officer to assist the task force, and those agencies or officers shall cooperate with 23the task force to the fullest extent possible.AB392,4,313. The department of administration shall reimburse members of the task 2force under this subsection for their actual and necessary expenses incurred in 3carrying out their functions.AB392,4,44(d) Duties.AB392,4,651. The task force under this subsection shall examine all of the following 6topics:AB392,4,117a. The systemic causes behind violence that African American women and 8girls experience, including patterns and underlying factors that explain why 9disproportionately high levels of violence occur against African American women 10and girls and including underlying historical, generational, social, economic, 11institutional, and cultural factors that may contribute to the violence.AB392,4,1412b. Appropriate methods for tracking and collecting data on violence against 13African American women and girls, including data on missing and murdered 14African American women and girls.AB392,4,1815c. Policies and institutions such as policing, child welfare, coroner practices, 16and other governmental practices that impact violence against African American 17women and girls and the investigation and prosecution of crimes of gender violence 18against African American women and girls.AB392,4,2019d. Measures necessary to address and reduce violence against African 20American women and girls.AB392,4,2321e. Measures to help victims, victims’ families, and victims’ communities 22prevent and heal from violence that occurs against African American women and 23girls.AB392,5,312. The task force under this subsection shall, by December 15, 2026, submit to 2the appropriate standing committees of the legislature in the manner provided 3under s. 13.172 (3) a report that includes all of the following:AB392,5,54a. Proposed institutional policies and practices that are effective in reducing 5gender violence and increasing the safety of African American women and girls.AB392,5,76b. Recommendations to eliminate violence against African American women 7and girls.AB392,5,98c. Recommendations to help victims and communities heal from gender 9violence and violence against African American women and girls.AB392,5,17103. In accomplishing the tasks in subds. 1. and 2., the task force under this 11subsection shall seek out and enlist the cooperation and assistance of 12nongovernmental organizations, community and advocacy organizations working 13with the African American community, and academic researchers and experts, 14specifically those specializing in violence against African American women and 15girls, representing diverse communities disproportionately affected by violence 16against women and girls or focusing on issues related to gender violence and 17violence against African American women and girls.AB392,5,2018(e) Termination. The task force on missing and murdered African American 19women and girls terminates on the earlier of the date on which the report under 20par. (d) 2. is submitted or January 1, 2027.AB392,221Section 2. Fiscal changes.AB392,6,722(1) Task force on missing and murdered African American women and 23girls. In the schedule under s. 20.005 (3) for the appropriation to the department 1of justice under s. 20.455 (3) (a), the dollar amount for fiscal year 2025-26 is 2increased by $80,200 to increase the authorized FTE positions for the department 3of justice by 1.0 GPR project position to staff the task force on missing and 4murdered African American women and girls until its termination. In the schedule 5under s. 20.005 (3) for the appropriation to the department of justice under s. 620.455 (3) (a), the dollar amount for fiscal year 2026-27 is increased by $99,500 to 7provide funding for the position authorized under this subsection.AB392,6,88